Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Sec. 08.71.220.
Persons practicing as dispensing opticians before July 1, 1973. [Repealed, § 30 ch 6 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 08.71.230.
Exemptions from and limitations on the application of this chapter.

This chapter may not be construed to

limit or restrict a licensed physician or optometrist from the practices enumerated in this chapter, and each licensed physician and optometrist has all the rights and privileges that may accrue under this chapter to dispensing opticians licensed under it;

prohibit an unlicensed person from performing mechanical work upon inert matter in an optical office, laboratory, or shop;

prohibit an unlicensed person from engaging in the sale of eyeglasses, spectacles, magnifying glasses, goggles, sunglasses, telescopes, binoculars, or any like articles that are completely preassembled and sold only as merchandise;

authorize or permit a licensee under this chapter to hold out as being able to, or to offer to, or to attempt by any means, to refract or exercise eyes, diagnose, treat, correct, relieve, operate, or prescribe for any human ailment, deficiency, deformity, disease, or injury;

limit the authority of a nonprofit organization approved by the department to distribute and fit used eyeglasses if the eyeglasses are distributed and fitted free of charge and the fitting of the eyeglasses conforms, to the extent possible, with a written prescription from a licensed physician or optometrist.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 1973; am § 12 ch 56 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 19 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

08.71.200

. Renumbered in 1973.

Sec. 08.71.240.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“dispensing optician” means a person who, on written prescription from a licensed physician or optometrist, prepares and dispenses to the intended wearer or person who writes the prescription, original or duplicate lenses, eyeglasses, contact lenses, and appurtenances to them, and interprets, measures, adapts, fits, and adjusts lenses, eyeglasses, contact lenses, and appurtenances to them in accordance with the written prescription, to the face for the aid or correction of visual or ocular anomalies of the human eye;

“supervision” means the provision of any needed direction, control, consultation, instruction, evaluation, and personal inspection of work being performed.

History.

(§ 1 ch 45 SLA 1973; am § 52 ch 218 SLA 1976; am §§ 13, 14 ch 56 SLA 1980; am § 4 ch 19 SLA 2008; am § 56 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 08.71.210. Renumbered in 1973. Paragraphs (1) — (3) were formerly (2) — (4); renumbered in 2010 to reflect the 2008 repeal of paragraph (1).

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in this section in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.